Hawaii statutes.
§134-14 Report. Within ten days after
the last day of each month, each of the authorities authorized in this chapter
to issue or revoke permits and licenses shall make a report to the department
of the attorney general of all permits and licenses issued or revoked by the
authority as of the last day of the preceding month. The report shall be in
the manner and form as the attorney general may prescribe. [L 1988, c 275, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next